Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-179.03
College of Medicine; physicians' assistants or associates; Board of Regents; powers.

The power and authority granted by sections 85-179.01 to 85-179.03 may be exercised in whole or in part and from time to time as the Board of Regents of the University of Nebraska may in its discretion determine.

Laws 1972, LB 985, § 3.